Utah statutes.
9-4-626.   Defaults -- Conveyance of title to federal government.
(1)  The authority in any contract with the federal government for annual
contributions may obligate itself to convey to the federal government
possession of or title to the project upon the occurrence of a substantial
default, as defined in the contract, with respect to the covenants and
conditions to which the authority is subject.
(2)  This obligation shall be specifically enforceable and does not constitute
a mortgage, notwithstanding any other laws.
(3)  In case of conveyance, the federal government may complete, operate,
manage, lease, convey, or otherwise deal with the project and funds in
accordance with the terms of the contract if the contract by its terms
requires the federal government, as soon as practicable after it is satisfied
that all defaults have been cured and that the project will be operated in
accordance with the contract, to reconvey the project to the authority.
